Georgia statutes. TITLE 11 Commercial Code
PART 1 Subject Matter and Definitions

11-4A-101.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Commercial Code—Funds Transfers.”

History. —
Code 1981, §11-4A-101, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2685, § 4.

11-4A-102.
Subject matter.

Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 11-4A-108, this article applies to funds transfers defined in Code Section 11-4A-104.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-4A-102, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2685, § 4.

11-4A-103.
Payment order — Definitions.

In this article:

“Payment order” means an instruction of a sender to a receiving bank, transmitted orally, electronically, or in writing, to pay, or to cause another bank to pay, a fixed or determinable amount of money to a beneficiary if:

“Beneficiary” means the person to be paid by the beneficiary’s bank.

“Beneficiary’s bank” means the bank identified in a payment order in which an account of the beneficiary is to be credited pursuant to the order or which otherwise is to make payment to the beneficiary if the order does not provide for payment to an account.

“Receiving bank” means the bank to which the sender’s instruction is addressed.

“Sender” means the person giving the instruction to the receiving bank.

If an instruction complying with subsection (a)(1) is to make more than one payment to a beneficiary, the instruction is a separate payment order with respect to each payment.

A payment order is issued when it is sent to the receiving bank.

The instruction does not state a condition to payment to the beneficiary other than time of payment,

The receiving bank is to be reimbursed by debiting an account of, or otherwise receiving payment from, the sender, and

The instruction is transmitted by the sender directly to the receiving bank or to an agent, funds-transfer system, or communication system for transmittal to the receiving bank.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-4A-103, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2685, § 4.

11-4A-104.
Funds transfer — Definitions.

In this article:

“Funds transfer” means the series of transactions, beginning with the originator’s payment order, made for the purpose of making payment to the beneficiary of the order.The term includes any payment order issued by the originator’s bank or an intermediary bank intended to carry out the originator’s payment order.A funds transfer is completed by acceptance by the beneficiary’s bank of a payment order for the benefit of the beneficiary of the originator’s payment order.

“Intermediary bank” means a receiving bank other than the originator’s bank or the beneficiary’s bank.

“Originator” means the sender of the first payment order in a funds transfer.

“Originator’s bank” means (i) the receiving bank to which the payment order of the originator is issued if the originator is not a bank, or (ii) the originator if the originator is a bank.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-4A-104, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2685, § 4.

11-4A-105.
Other definitions.

In this article:

“Authorized account” means a deposit account of a customer in a bank designated by the customer as a source of payment of payment orders issued by the customer to the bank.If a customer does not so designate an account, any account of the customer is an authorized account if payment of a payment order from that account is not inconsistent with a restriction on the use of that account.

“Bank” means a person engaged in the business of banking and includes a savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union, and trust company. A branch or separate office of a bank is a separate bank for purposes of this article.

“Customer” means a person, including a bank, having an account with a bank or from whom a bank has agreed to receive payment orders.

“Funds-transfer business day” of a receiving bank means the part of a day during which the receiving bank is open for the receipt, processing, and transmittal of payment orders and cancellations and amendments of payment orders.

“Funds-transfer system” means a wire transfer network, automated clearing house, or other communication system of a clearing house or other association of banks through which a payment order by a bank may be transmitted to the bank to which the order is addressed.

Reserved.

“Prove” with respect to a fact means to meet the burden of establishing the fact (Code Section 11-1-201(b)(8)).

Other definitions applying to this article and the Code sections in which they appear are:

“Acceptance.” Code Section 11-4A-209.

“Beneficiary.” Code Section 11-4A-103.

“Beneficiary’s bank.” Code Section 11-4A-103.

“Executed.” Code Section 11-4A-301.

“Execution date.” Code Section 11-4A-301.

“Funds transfer.” Code Section 11-4A-104.

“Funds-transfer system rule.” Code Section 11-4A-501.

“Intermediary bank.” Code Section 11-4A-104.

“Originator.” Code Section 11-4A-104.

“Originator’s bank.” Code Section 11-4A-104.

“Payment by beneficiary’s bank to beneficiary.” Code Section 11-4A-405.

“Payment by originator to beneficiary.” Code Section 11-4A-406.

“Payment by sender to receiving bank.” Code Section 11-4A-403.

“Payment date.” Code Section 11-4A-401.

“Payment order.” Code Section 11-4A-103.

“Receiving bank.” Code Section 11-4A-103.

“Security procedure.” Code Section 11-4A-201.

“Sender.” Code Section 11-4A-103.

The following definitions in Article 4 of this title apply to this article:

“Clearing house.” Code Section 11-4-104.

“Item.” Code Section 11-4-104.

“Suspends payments.” Code Section 11-4-104.

In addition Article 1 of this title contains general definitions and principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout this article.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-4A-105, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2685, § 4; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3B-13/SB 65.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, substituted “Reserved” for “ ‘Good faith’ means honesty in fact and the observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing” in paragraph (a)(6); and substituted “Section 11-1-201(b)(8)” for “Section 11-1-201(8)” in paragraph (a)(7).

11-4A-106.
Time payment order is received.

The time of receipt of a payment order or communication canceling or amending a payment order is determined by the rules applicable to receipt of a notice stated in Code Section 11-1-202. A receiving bank may fix a cut-off time or times on a funds-transfer business day for the receipt and processing of payment orders and communications canceling or amending payment orders. Different cut-off times may apply to payment orders, cancellations, or amendments, or to different categories of payment orders, cancellations, or amendments. A cut-off time may apply to senders generally or different cut-off times may apply to different senders or categories of payment orders. If a payment order or communication canceling or amending a payment order is received after the close of a funds-transfer business day or after the appropriate cut-off time on a funds-transfer business day, the receiving bank may treat the payment order or communication as received at the opening of the next funds-transfer business day.

If this article refers to an execution date or payment date or states a day on which a receiving bank is required to take action, and the date or day does not fall on a funds-transfer business day, the next day that is a funds-transfer business day is treated as the date or day stated, unless the contrary is stated in this article.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-4A-106, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2685, § 4; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3B-14/SB 65.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, substituted “Section 11-1-202” for “Section 11-1-201(27)” at the end of subsection (a).

11-4A-107.
Federal Reserve regulations and operating circulars.

Regulations of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System and operating circulars of the federal reserve banks supersede any inconsistent provision of this article to the extent of the inconsistency.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-4A-107, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2685, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 11.

The 2002 amendment,

effective April 18, 2002, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised capitalization in this Code section.

11-4A-108.
Relationship to federal Electronic Fund Transfer Act.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, this article does not apply to a funds transfer any part of which is governed by the federal Electronic Fund Transfer Act of 1978, 15 U.S.C. Section 1693, et seq.

This article shall apply to a funds transfer that is a remittance transfer as defined in the federal Electronic Fund Transfer Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 1693o-1(g), unless the remittance transfer is an electronic fund transfer as defined in such act, 15 U.S.C. Section 1693(a).

In the event of any conflict or inconsistency between the provisions of this article and the provisions of the federal Electronic Fund Transfer Act of 1978, 15 U.S.C. Section 1693, et seq., such act shall govern and control.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-4A-108, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2685, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 11; Ga. L. 2013, p. 1101, § 1/HB 289.

The 2002 amendment,

effective April 18, 2002, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in this Code section.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in the catchline substituted “Relationship to federal Electronic Fund Transfer Act” for “Exclusion of consumer transactions governed by federal law” and substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “This article does not apply to a funds transfer any part of which is governed by the Electronic Fund Transfer Act of 1978 (Title XX, Public Law 95-630, 92 Stat. 3728, 15 U.S.C. Section 1693, et seq.) as amended from time to time.”